en: Garden hose design: Coiled; Drip; Expandable; Flat; Heated; Soaker; Spring retractable; Sprinkler; Standard; Other
nl: Tuinslangontwerp: Opgerold; Druppelslang; Uitbreidbaar; Vlak; Verwarmd; Zweetslang; Zelfoprollend (veer); Sproeier; Standaard; Overig
es: Diseño de manguera de jardín: En espiral; Goteo; Ampliable; Plano; Calefactado; Irrigador; Resorte retráctil; Aspersor; Estándar; Otros
ro-RO: Proiectarea furtunului de grădină: Elicoidal; Picurare; Extensibil; Plat; Încălzit; De udare; Arc retractabil; Cu aspersor; Standard; Altele
sk-SK: Dizajn záhradnej hadice: Špirálový; Kvapkanie; Rozšíriteľný; Rovná; Vyhrievaná; Namáčacia; Pružinové samonavíjanie; Postrekovacia; Štandardná; Iné
zh-TW: 園藝水管設計: 盤繞; 滴; 可擴展; 平頂; 加熱; 滲水管; 彈簧可伸縮; 灑水器; 標準; 其他
da: Haveslangedesign: Oprullet; Dryp; Kan udvides; Flad; Opvarmet; Soaker; Fjederudtrækkelig; Sprinkler; Standard; Andet
pl: Typ węża ogrodowego: Spiralne; Kroplujący; Do rozbudowy; Płaskie; Podgrzewane; Kroplujące; Zwijany sprężynowo; Zraszające; Standard; Pozostałe
hu: Kerti tömlő kialakítása: Tekercselt; Csepegtető; Bővíthető; Lapos; Fűtött; Áztató; Visszahúzó rugó; Locsoló; Normál; Egyéb
nb: Design for hageslange: Kveilet; Drypp; Utvidbar; Flat; Oppvarmet; Dryppslange; Fjær uttrekkbar; Sprinklere; Standard; Annet
fr: Conception du tuyau d’arrosage: Enroulé; Goutte; Extensible; Plat; Chauffé; Tuyau poreux; Rétractable à ressort; Arroseur; Standard; Autre
vi: Thiết kế vòi tưới vườn: Xoắn lò xo; Nhỏ giọt; Có thể mở rộng; Phẳng; Làm nóng; Vòi tưới nhỏ giọt; Cuộn lại bằng lò xo; Vòi phun; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
pt-PT: Design da mangueira de jardim: Enrolado; Gota a gota; Expansível; Plano; Aquecido; Regador; Retrátil com mola; Aspersor; Padrão; Outro
th: การออกแบบสายยางรดน้ำ: ขด; แบบน้ำหยด; ขยายได้; เรียบ; แบบอุ่น; แบบซึม; แบบสปริงดึงกลับ; สปริงเกอร์; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
cs: Provedení zahradní hadice: Spirálové; Kapkovací hadice; Smršťovací; Ploché; Vyhřívané; Prosakovací; Samonavíjecí; Zavlažovač; Standardní; Jiné
lt-LT: Sodo žarnos konstrukcija: Susuktas; Lašantis; Išplečiamas; Plokščias; Šildomas; Lašinamasis; Ištraukiama spyruoklė; Purkštuvas; Standartinis; Kita
ru: Конструкция садового шланга: Спиральный; Капельный; Растягивающийся; Плоский; С подогревом; Сочащийся; С пружинным механизмом; Шланг-дождеватель; Стандартный; Другой
sl-SI: Zasnova vrtne cevi: Spiralni; Kapljanje; Razširljiv; Ploščata; Ogrevan; Soaker; Vzmetno zložljivo; Razpršilniki; Standardna; Druga
bg-BG: Дизайн на градински маркуч: Навит; Капково; Разгъващ се; Плоска форма; С нагряване; Капков; Пружинно прибиращо се; Разпръсквач за поливане; Стандартен; Друго
it: Progettazione del tubo da giardino: A spirale; Gocciolamento; Espandibile; Piatto; Riscaldato; Tubo poroso; Molla retrattile; Sprinkler; Standard; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός λάστιχου ποτίσματος: Σπειροειδές; Σταγόνα; Επεκτάσιμο; Επίπεδη; Θερμαινόμενο; Soaker; Με ελατήριο επαναφοράς; Ποτιστικό; Τυπικό; Άλλο
tr: Bahçe hortumu tasarımı: Sarmal; Damla; Genişletilebilir; Düz; Isıtmalı; Sızdırma; Yaylı geri çekilebilir; Yağmurlama; Standart; Diğer
hr-HR: Dizajn vrtnog crijeva: Spiralno; Kap po kap; Proširivo; Ravna; Grijano; Namakanje; Uvlačna opruga; Prskalica vode; Standardno; Ostalo
sv: Trädgårdsslangens design: Ringad; Dropp; Expanderbar; Platt; Uppvärmd; Blötläggare; Infällbar fjäder; Sprinkler; Standard; Övrigt
pt-BR: Design da mangueira de jardim: Enrolado; Gotejamento; Expansível; Plano; Aquecido; Mangueira de irrigação por gotejamento; Mola retrátil; Aspersores; Padrão; Outro
zh-CN: 花园水管的设计: 卷曲式; 滴灌; 伸缩式; 扁平式; 加热式; 渗水式; 弹簧伸缩; 喷洒式; 标准型; 其他
de: Gartenschlauchdesign: Gewickelt; Tropfen; Erweiterbar; Flach; Erhitzt; Tropfer; Feder einziehbar; Sprinkler; Standard; Sonstiges
fi: Puutarhaletkun muotoilu: Kierretty; Pisara; Laajennettava; Tasainen; Lämmitetty; Tihkuttava; Jousivetoinen; Sprinkleri; Tavallinen; Muu
ja: ガーデンホースのデザイン: コイル状; 滴下; 拡張可能; フラット; 凍結防止用; 浸透ホース; スプリング格納式; スプリンクラー; スタンダード; その他
ko: 정원용 호스 디자인: 코일; 드립; 확장 가능; 플랫; 가열됨; 흡수식; 스프링 자동 감김; 스프링클러; 표준; 기타